Illinois, session 104th, HB3180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 514-19 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-19 new)7    Sec. 14-19. Parental notice of right to IEP advocate and 8facilitator. A school shall provide written notice to the 9parents or guardian of a child with disabilities that the 10parents or guardian have the right to have an individualized 11education program (IEP) advocate present at any meeting 12regarding the child's current or prospective individualized 13education program and that the parents or guardian have the 14right to ask for an IEP facilitator for the child's IEP. The 15school may provide the written notification as a part of other 16provided documentation, including, but not limited to, 17admission and enrollment documents.